Massachusetts, session 194th, H3853.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6B of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
further amended by striking out, in paragraph 3, the words “, provided, that the surviving spouse 
does not remarry,”.